Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1926.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GREATER MINNEAPOLIS COUNCIL OF CHURCHES FOOD SHELVES.new text end new text begin (a) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for a grant to Greater Minneapolis Council of Churches to provide funding to food shelves enrolled in the Minnesota FoodShare program. The grant funds must be distributed to food shelves based on the Minnesota FoodShare program's distribution formula. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) Greater Minneapolis Council of Churches must report on the number of food shelves receiving these grant funds, the amount distributed to each food shelf, and any amount used for administrative purposes to the commissioner of children, youth, and families by August 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) Greater Minneapolis Council of Churches may use up to five percent of the appropriation for administrative costs. new text end